Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4433.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 46, is amended to read: Subd. 46. Agate Housing and Services 5,000,000 new text begin (a) new text end For a grant to Agate Housing and Services to design, construct, equip, and furnish a shelter facility in the city of Minneapolis for those experiencing homelessness. new text begin (b) Any money remaining after the project in paragraph (a) is completed may be used to acquire property for, predesign, design, furnish, equip, renovate, and construct a shelter facility located in the city of Minneapolis. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end